District of Columbia statutes.
2-1403.09

Service of process.

In all cases where the Office is required to effect service, it shall be accomplished by regular, registered, or certified mail, return receipt requested, by electronic mail, or by personal service and shall otherwise be in accordance with rules of the Office regarding service and notice.

Dec. 13, 1977, D.C. Law 2-38, title III, § 309, 24 DCR 6038
Mar. 14, 2012, D.C. Law 19-112, § 2, 59 DCR 453
1981 Ed., § 1-2549.
1973 Ed., § 6-2289.
D.C. Law 19-112 substituted “regular, registered, or certified mail, return receipt requested, by electronic mail,” for “registered or certified mail, return receipt requested”.